src/morphology/affixes/acronyms.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


LEXICON ACRONOUN_cons  
 ACRONOUN ;

LEXICON ACRONOUN_vow  
 ACRONOUN ;

LEXICON UNIT   !!= * __@CODE@__  As acro, but without paradigm
+N+ABBR: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ACRO_ACCRA  !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;
!+N+Prop:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACRO_BERN
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;
!+N+Prop:%> BERN-UCASE ;

LEXICON ACRO_LONDON
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;
!+N+Prop:%> LONDON-UCASE ;

LEXICON ACRO_NYSTØ
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;
!+N+Prop:%> NYSTØ-OBL ;

LEXICON ACRO_cons 
 ACRO ;    

LEXICON ACRO_vow 
 ACRO ;    


LEXICON ACRO 
 +N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ; 
 
LEXICON DYN_ACRO_cons 
 DYN_ACRO ;    

LEXICON DYN_ACRO_vow 
 DYN_ACRO ;    
   

LEXICON DYN_ACRO
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn: acroconnector ;


LEXICON ACRONOUN              ! Here we add the POS tag
+N+ACR: acroconnector ;

LEXICON acroconnector     ! Here comes a set of possible symbols to ...
               acronull ; ! SgNom only in sma
         :%>%: acrosuff ;
 +Err/Orth:%>%- acrosuff ; 
 +Err/Orth:%>   acrosuff ; ! ... put between the abbreviation and its suffix
 +Err/Orth:%>'  acrosuff ; ! No POS tag here in order to avoid the POS
 +Err/Orth:%>%´ acrosuff ; ! tag for non-ACRO entries using the acroconnector
 +Err/Orth:%>%` acrosuff ; ! inflection lexicon. (cf. the punct-sme-lex.txt file)
               RHyph    ; ! Acros compound with a hyphen
 +Err/Orth:     R ;        ! Without hyphen, not normative:  NRK23

LEXICON acronull
+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON acrosuff
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:en   # ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:em   # ;
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:asse # ;

+Sg+Gen:n       # ;
+Sg+Acc:m       # ;
+Sg+Ill:se      # ;
+Sg+Ine:sne     # ;   ! NRK:sne
+Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:esne     # ;   ! NRK:esne
+Sg+Ela:ste     # ;   ! NRK:ste
+Sg+Com:ine     # ;
+Pl+Nom:h       # ;
+Pl+Gen:j       # ;
+Pl+Acc:ide     # ;
+Pl+Ill:ide     # ;
+Pl+Ine:ine     # ;
+Pl+Ela:jste    # ;
+Pl+Com:jgujmie # ;
+Ess:ine        # ; ! NBR:ine
