src/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON LETTERNUMBER
Jå2 ACRO ;
A4 ACRO ;
A3 ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
NRK2 ACRO ;
UTF-8 ACRO ;
LU1 ACRO ;
P1 ACRO ;
A/L ACRO ;
ECHAM/OPYC3 ACRO ;
U19 ACRO ;
U23 ACRO ;
4-A ACRO ;
2-C ACRO ;
3-A ACRO ;
K/S ACRO ;
S/S ACRO ;
L97S ACRO ;
O-97 ACRO ;
P3 ACRO ;
CO2 ACRO ;
P4 ACRO ;
P-2 ACRO ;
P-4 ACRO ;
SVT2 ACRO ;
TV4 ACRO ;
Q-2 ACRO ;
km/t ACRO ;
km/h ACRO ;
Jå2 ACRO ;
ovttas.no+Err/Orth:Ovttas.no ACRO ;
V-8%0%0 ACRO ;
LEXICON SOMELONGACRO
 EXFACFON+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:EXFACFON ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
xsl ACRO ;
html ACRO ;
AKP ACRO ;
AMI ACRO ;
ANSI ACRO ;
AP ACRO ;
AB ACRO ;
BBS ACRO ;
BMW ACRO ;
BNP ACRO ;
BRD ACRO ;
 BASIC+Err/Orth:BASIC ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
DAP ACRO ;
DIN ACRO ;
SKINN ACRO ;
 UNIKOM+Err/Orth:UNIKOM ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 COCOM+Err/Orth:COCOM ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
FUG ACRO ;
COMECON+Err/Orth:COMECON ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
UEFA+Err/Orth:UEFA ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
ICES ACRO ;
EKG ACRO ;
NRK ACRO ;
INTEREG+Err/Orth:INTEREG ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
MD ACRO ;
ARN ACRO ;
BI ACRO ;
UR ACRO ;
UN ACRO ;
EU ACRO ;
TV ACRO ;
III ACRO ;
JA ACRO ;
CD ACRO ;
SKR ACRO ;
USA ACRO ;
SSO ACRO ;
IL ACRO ;
SMK ACRO ;
RD ACRO ;
DD ACRO ;
OED ACRO ;
BHD ACRO ;
AD ACRO ;
PM ACRO ;
OT ACRO ;
PPS ACRO ;
NSU ACRO ;
LTI ACRO ;
IZH ACRO ;
GM ACRO ;
ERF ACRO ;
AEC ACRO ;
ET ACRO ;
RE ACRO ;
SG ACRO ;
SF ACRO ;
SPR ACRO ;
YLE ACRO ;
OG ACRO ;
SNPN ACRO ;
 ASVO+Err/Orth:ASVO ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
EES ACRO ;
RDA ACRO ;
PPT ACRO ;
NAČ ACRO ;
DJ ACRO ;
SNF ACRO ;
NEG ACRO ;
SÁB ACRO ;
SEG ACRO ;
SVT ACRO ;
TIL ACRO ;
GB ACRO ;
OSL ACRO ;
SDD ACRO ;
IKT ACRO ;
SAFE ACRO ;
NSB ACRO ;
SIFI ACRO ;
 ILIOS+Err/Orth:ILIOS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NKS ACRO ;
SVL-S ACRO ;
SND ACRO ;
FFR ACRO ;
NNS ACRO ;
PC ACRO ;
GO ACRO ;
NIBR ACRO ;
BONO ACRO ;
 NATO+Err/Orth:NATO ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
HO ACRO ;
YSS ACRO ;
SSB ACRO ;
PFK ACRO ;
SLF ACRO ;
BUL ACRO ;
SL ACRO ;
DAT ACRO ;
UKM ACRO ;
SGP ACRO ;
SDS ACRO ;
AP ACRO ;
HFK ACRO ;
SÁL ACRO ;
NJFF ACRO ;
IN ACRO ;
SOL ACRO ;
OD ACRO ;
FIM ACRO ;
DN ACRO ;
DA ACRO ;
NM ACRO ;
HK ACRO ;
RUF ACRO ;
LO ACRO ;
SOG ACRO ;
FMX ACRO ;
NGO ACRO ;
LEI ACRO ;
RSS ACRO ;
VUK ACRO ;
JPG ACRO ;
GSM ACRO ;
SJS ACRO ;
ANS ACRO ;
SNO ACRO ;
RO ACRO ;
SSG ACRO ;
KKS ACRO ;
SNJ ACRO ;
PIL ACRO ;
NÁČ ACRO ;
ILO ACRO ;
BOF ACRO ;
UNTAK ACRO ;
GL ACRO ;
FUOM ACRO ;
ASA ACRO ;
 NORUT+Err/Orth:NORUT ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
LHL ACRO ;
SCPAR ACRO ;
 UNICEF+Err/Orth:UNICEF ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
SDR ACRO ;
 REMA+Err/Orth:REMA ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
OHCAN ACRO ;
KJSS ACRO ;
CERD ACRO ;
USKAV ACRO ;
SD ACRO ;
NSR-N ACRO ;
SSSR ACRO ;
SB ACRO ;
NIF ACRO ;
MÁ ACRO ;
GJ ACRO ;
DON ACRO ;
CO ACRO ;
YEH ACRO ;
UNN ACRO ;
SF-%012 ACRO ;
OH ACRO ;
LMK ACRO ;
IW ACRO ;
GDL ACRO ;
SAÁO ACRO ;
NČE ACRO ;
FN ACRO ;
TONO ACRO ;
SÁ ACRO ;
MGD ACRO ;
JSL ACRO ;
FE ACRO ;
DVD ACRO ;
CIA ACRO ;
UD ACRO ;
SFO ACRO ;
OL ACRO ;
 MUVÁ+Err/Orth:MUVÁ ACRO; ! MuVá
MIEHTÁ ACRO ;
LLH ACRO ;
FAS ACRO ;
ESA ACRO ;
DNA ACRO ;
ADSL ACRO ;
UDI ACRO ;
SK ACRO ;
NMK ACRO ;
JK ACRO ;
EEK ACRO ;
DS ACRO ;
DAB ACRO ;
BOL ACRO ;
AL ACRO ;
WWF ACRO ;
SUF ACRO ;
SLČ ACRO ;
SBB ACRO ;
KD ACRO ;
ILUS ACRO ;
IDE ACRO ;
FS ACRO ;
FÁGA ACRO ;
DPS ACRO ;
BBC ACRO ;
 ÁJA+Err/Orth:ÁJA ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
VM ACRO ;
SKS ACRO ;
ISA ACRO ;
SDGB ACRO ;
MNOSS ACRO ;
LU ACRO ;
JL ACRO ;
DSE ACRO ;
 ÁLGU+Err/Orth:ÁLGU ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
TT ACRO ;
SUS ACRO ;
SEK ACRO ;
NASCO ACRO ;
 KRIPOS+Err/Orth:KRIPOS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KGD ACRO ;
HRW ACRO ;
DSJ ACRO ;
BUP ACRO ;
BU ACRO ;
WWM ACRO ;
WINHEC ACRO ;
US ACRO ;
UNEP ACRO ;
SRV ACRO ;
SBSS ACRO ;
NSD ACRO ;
MMI ACRO ;
KIM ACRO ;
HVS ACRO ;
GS ACRO ;
FC ACRO ;
EN ACRO ;
EEC ACRO ;
EM ACRO ;
EDB ACRO ;
DIR ACRO ;
BNO ACRO ;
APTN ACRO ;
NuorajTV+Err/Orth:Nuoraj-tv ACRO ;
NuorajTV ACRO ;
UDSL ACRO ;
SU ACRO ;
SSR ACRO ;
SFR ACRO ;
SAP ACRO ;
RAG ACRO ;
PFL ACRO ;
OLU ACRO ;
NTB ACRO ;
NB ACRO ;
LOBI ACRO ;
KBB ACRO ;
IWGIA ACRO ;
IIIA ACRO ;
GJSL ACRO ;
FPPS ACRO ;
FA ACRO ;
DT ACRO ;
CC ACRO ;
AYC ACRO ;
UNG ACRO ;
UB ACRO ;
SIVA ACRO ;
SGRN ACRO ;
KM ACRO ;
KR ACRO ;
SOR ACRO ;
 SEFO+Err/Orth:SEFO ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 SATØ+Err/Orth:SATØ ACRO; ! SATø
SAF ACRO ;
RNNU ACRO ;
RBK ACRO ;
RSDAP ACRO ;
RMS ACRO ;
TD ACRO ;
ORO ACRO ;
 OASIS+Err/Orth:OASIS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NINA-NIKU ACRO ;
NHO ACRO ;
NAF ACRO ;
DKS ACRO ;
MBL ACRO ;
KLP ACRO ;
KAB ACRO ;
ISDN ACRO ;
GJSS ACRO ;
FAO ACRO ;
DSI ACRO ;
DÁ ACRO ;
BES ACRO ;
ASS ACRO ;
 ACTA+Err/Orth:ACTA ACRO;!  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
VVS ACRO ;
ERUF ACRO ;
 BIBSYS+Err/Orth:BIBSYS ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
SKUP ACRO ;
LSD ACRO ;
MP ACRO ;
CBS ACRO ;
IRE ACRO ;
INRI ACRO ;
RAF ACRO ;
EØF ACRO ;
FID ACRO ;
JD ACRO ;
K.F.U.M ACRO ;
KUD ACRO ;
MG ACRO ;
MS-DOS ACRO ;
MVD ACRO ;
NEP ACRO ;
NKP ACRO ;
NRF ACRO ;
NT ACRO ;
OCR ACRO ;
OECD ACRO ;
SHD ACRO ;
SUN ACRO ;
APP ACRO ;
LEXICON smallacro
NMu ACRO ;
PLo ACRO ;
tv ACRO ;
PowerPC ACRO ;
SMSAm ACRO ;
GPu ACRO ;
Krk ACRO ;
Art ACRO ;
NHo ACRO ;
Eu ACRO ;
Bbl ACRO ;
DeS ACRO ;
 SATø+Err/Orth:SATø ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
DnB ACRO ;
Dssn ACRO ;
FBb ACRO ;
Flf ACRO ;
Frp ACRO ;
Tlf ACRO ;
Gb ACRO ;
pdf ACRO ;
HadCM ACRO ;
Jd ACRO ;
 K-ent+Err/Orth:K-ent ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KiMK ACRO ;
KoKo ACRO ;
Krf ACRO ;
KáB ACRO ;
LaW ACRO ;
MiF ACRO ;
 MuVá+Err/Orth:MuVá ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 NoKTuRNL+Err/Orth:NoKTuRNL ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Or ACRO ;
ekg ACRO ;
 komvux+Err/Orth:komvux ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Sf ACRO ;
kVA ACRO ;
pps ACRO ;
SfB ACRO ;
Kml ACRO ;
Rv ACRO ;
Sfruo ACRO ;
StA ACRO ;
UiO ACRO ;
 UiTø+Err/Orth:UiTø ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
SvJT ACRO ;
SUKPb ACRO ;
PhD ACRO ;
FrP ACRO ;
App ACRO ;
